Utah statutes.
77-36-8.   Peace officers' immunity from liability.

A peace officer may not be held liable in any civil action brought by a party to an incident of domestic violence for making or failing to make an arrest or for issuing or failing to issue a citation in accordance with this chapter, for enforcing in good faith an order of the court, or for acting or omitting to act in any other way in good faith under this chapter, in situations arising from an alleged incident of domestic violence.



Amended by Chapter 300, 1995 General Session

